Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 8.2
PRODUCTS OF THE REHABILITATION
CENTER FOR THE VISUALLY IMPAIRED

Section

26-8.2-101. Legislative declaration.

It is the purpose of this article to further the policy of this state to encourage and assist blind individuals to achieve maximum personal independence through useful and productive gainful employment by assuring an expanded and consistent manner for sale of blind-made products and services, thereby enhancing the dignity and capacity for self-support of blind persons and minimizing their dependence on welfare and costly institutionalization.

To further the purposes of this article and to contribute to the economy of state government, it is the intent of the general assembly that there be close cooperation between the rehabilitation center for the visually impaired and the division of correctional industries or any other state agency from which procurement of products or services is required under the provisions of any law in effect on July 1, 1979.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1098, § 1, effective July 1.

26-8.2-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Center" means the rehabilitation center for the visually impaired of the state department of human services.

"Public agency" means any public office, officer, department, commission, institution, or bureau, any agency, division, or unit within a department or office, or any other public authority of this state. "Public agency" shall not include any municipality, county, school district, special district, nor any other political subdivision of this state.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1098, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1158, § 118, effective July 1, 1994.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 230, Session Laws of Colorado 1993.

26-8.2-103. Sale of products.

In order to provide preferential treatment to the products and services of the center offered for sale, public agencies shall purchase such products and services directly from the center in accordance with applicable specifications of the department of personnel. When such products and services are available, the price determined by the center shall be an amount equal to the cost of raw materials, labor, overhead, and delivery.

The center may furnish to any person authorized to make purchases for any public agency and to all political subdivisions of the state a list of available products and services which are suitable for procurement.

Notwithstanding any provision of this article, no purchase shall be made of any product or service that does not conform to the standards and specifications necessary for the purpose for which the goods are required.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1098, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 1541, § 131, effective June 1.

26-8.2-104. Contracts.

The executive director of the department of personnel shall not approve any contracts made in violation of this article by any public agency over which he has control of purchasing.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1099, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1296, § 36, effective January 1, 1982.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1542, § 132, effective June 1.

26-8.2-105. Cooperation of center with other agencies.

The center and the division of correctional industries and any other public agency from which procurement of products or services is required under any law in effect on July 1, 1979, are authorized to enter into such contractual agreements, cooperative working relationships, or other arrangements as may be beneficial for effective coordination and efficient realization of the objectives of this article and any other law requiring procurement of products or services from any public agency.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 1099, § 1, effective July 1.